North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-03 Department of Public Instruction

15.1-03-01.
Department of public instruction — Establishment.

There is established a department of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction is the chief administrative officer of the department of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 3.

15.1-03-02.
Revolving school district equipment and software fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 148, § 1.

15.1-03-03.
Revolving printing fund — Instructional materials — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 3; repealed by 2021, ch. 139, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.